Washington statutes.
RCW 39.110.090

Bonds—Payment source—Disclosures—Proceeds not public money—Contracting.

(1) Bonds issued by an authority established under this chapter are not considered to constitute a debt of the state, of the municipality, or of any other municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, subdivision, or agency of this state or to pledge any or all of the faith and credit of any of these entities. The revenue bonds are payable solely from both the revenues derived as a result of the economic development activities funded by the revenue bonds including, without limitation, amounts received under the terms of any financing document or by reason of any additional security furnished by beneficiaries of the economic development activity in connection with the financing thereof, and money and other property received from private sources. The issuance of bonds under this chapter do not obligate, directly, indirectly, or contingently, the state or any political subdivision of the state to levy any taxes or appropriate or expend any funds for the payment of the principal or the interest on the bonds. Each revenue bond must contain on its face, and any disclosure document prepared in conjunction with the offer and sale of bonds must include, statements to the effect that:

(a) Neither the state, the municipality, or any other municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, subdivision, or agency of the state is obligated to pay the principal or the interest thereon;

(b) No tax funds or governmental revenue may be used to pay the principal or interest thereon; and

(c) Neither any or all of the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the state, the municipality, or any other municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, subdivision, or agency thereof is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on the revenue bond.

(2) Neither the proceeds of bonds issued under this chapter nor any money used or to be used to pay the principal of, premium, if any, or interest on the bonds constitute public money or property. All of such money must be kept segregated and set apart from funds of the state and any political subdivision of the state and are not subject to appropriation or allotment by the state or subject to the provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW.

(3) Contracts entered into by an authority must be entered into in the name of the authority and not in the name of the state or any political subdivision of the state. The obligations of the authority under such contracts are obligations only of the authority and are not, in any way, obligations of the municipality creating the authority or the state. An authority may incur only those financial obligations which will be paid from revenues received pursuant to financing documents, from fees or charges paid by beneficiaries of the economic development activities funded by the revenue bonds, or from the proceeds of revenue bonds.

[ 2012 c 193 s 11.]